Wyoming, session 2025, SF0189.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 34.1-8-110(b)(intro), 34.1-8-503(a),
34.1-8-511(a) and 34.1-9-305(a)(iii) are amended to
read:

34.1-8-110. Applicability; choice of law.

SF0189

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0784
(b) The local law of the securities intermediary's
jurisdiction, as specified in subsection (e) of this
section, state governs:

34.1-8-503. Property interest of entitlement holder
in financial asset held by securities intermediary.

(a) To the extent necessary for a securities
intermediary to satisfy all security entitlements with
respect to a particular financial asset, all interests in
that financial asset held by the securities intermediary
are held by the securities intermediary for the entitlement
holders, are not property of the securities intermediary,
and are not subject to claims of creditors of the
securities intermediary., except as otherwise provided in
W.S. 34.1-8-511.

34.1-8-511. Priority among security interests and
entitlement holders.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (b)
and (c) of this section, If a securities intermediary does
not have sufficient interests in a particular financial
SF0189

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0784
asset to satisfy both its obligations to entitlement
holders who have security entitlements to that financial
asset and its obligation to a creditor of the securities
intermediary who has a security interest in that financial
asset, the claims of entitlement holders, other than the
creditor, have priority over the claim of the creditor.

34.1-9-305. Law governing perfection and priority of
security interests in investment property.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c),
the following rules apply:

(iii) The local law of the securities
intermediary's jurisdiction as specified in section
34.1-8-110(e) this state governs perfection, the effect of
perfection or nonperfection and the priority of a security
interest in a security entitlement or securities account;

Section 2. W.S. 34.1-8-110(e) and (f) and
34.1-8-511(b) and (c) are repealed.

SF0189

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0784
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0189